North Carolina, session 2025, SB869.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, the sum of five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000) in recurring funds beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year to reduce the
county share of payments for the State-County Special Assistance in-home program.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S869-v-1*